Tennessee, session 114, SB2189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1021(b)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) Physical activity may include:
(A) Walking, jumping rope, playing volleyball, or other forms of physical
activity that promote fitness and well-being;
(B) Structured movement breaks; and
(C) Time spent by a student in a physical education class if during such
time the students are physically active.
(2) Walking to and from class is not physical activity for purposes of this section.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1021(b)(2)(A)(ii), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(ii) Does not include time during which a student is permitted to use an electronic
device; and
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1021(b)(2)(B), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(B) A teacher may prevent a student from participating in physcial activity to
improve the student's behavior.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to the 2026-2027 school year and each school year thereafter.
SB2189
011096
- 1 -